Alabama, session 2026rs, SB182.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
13 Section 1. Section 12-19-290, Code of Alabama 1975, is
14 amended to read as follows:
15 "§12-19-290
16 (a) The Administrative Office of Courts Advanced
17 Technology and Data Exchange Fund is created in the State
18 Treasury.
19 (b) The fund shall consist of all monies paid into the
20 State Treasury to the credit of the fund pursuant to Section
21 12-19-181 or by legislative appropriations, grant, gift, or
22 otherwise.
23 (c) Monies contained in the Advanced Technology and
24 Data Exchange Fund fund may be expended to provide for any
25 activities involving the administration of justice, including,
26 but not limited to, the following purposes:
27 (1) Expand methods and means for collection and
28 disbursement of court-ordered monies through the use of credit
Page 1

disbursement of court-ordered monies through the use of credit
SB182 Enrolled
29 cards, electronic fund transfers, or other means and provide
30 for electronic transfer of records and storage.
31 (2) Enhance coordination and sharing of data with
32 local, state, and federal agencies, members of the bar, and
33 the public.
34 (3) Provide equipment for electronically filing cases.
35 (4) Improve accountability for case filings and
36 dispositions.
37 (5) Train and educate employees and officials on the
38 state and municipal levels of the Unified Judicial System
39 regarding legal and administrative policies and procedures and
40 effective usage of the courts' management systems.
41 (6) Provide education materials including, but not
42 limited to, manuals, forms, handbooks, books, brochures, and
43 technology for legal research and case management for court
44 officials and employees and component groups of the legal
45 community.
46 (7) Provide staff, services, and equipment required to
47 maintain and expand technological improvements and conduct
48 continuing education and training in these areas.
49 (8) Provide for any other use by the Administrative
50 Office of Courts, as determined by the Administrative Director
51 of Courts, for the general operation of the courts in the
52 state.
53 (8)(9)a. Pay service charges, electronic transfer fees,
54 or any other transaction costs associated with subdivisions
55 (1) to (7)(8), inclusive.
56 b. All such costs shall be paid out of funds
Page 2

b. All such costs shall be paid out of funds
SB182 Enrolled
57 appropriated to the Administrative Office of Courts Advanced
58 Technology and Data Exchange Fund and shall not reduce amounts
59 due to be distributed to other governmental funds or entities.
60 (d)(1) Subject to the adoption of uniform rules by the
61 Administrative Office of Courts, the clerks of the circuit and
62 district courts may accept credit cards, charge cards, or
63 debit cards issued from any bank, foreign lender, domestic
64 lender, or credit card bank as defined in Section 5-20-3 for
65 the payment of court costs, fees, fines, forfeitures,
66 judgments, restitution, attorney fees, any monies collected
67 and payable to individuals, businesses or partnerships, or any
68 person or entity or assessments of any kind. Any other
69 provision of law to the contrary notwithstanding, the clerk of
70 the court or agent thereof accepting payment as provided for
71 in this subsection shall impose and collect a surcharge or
72 convenience fee in respect of payments made by credit card,
73 charge card, or debit card for any of the above in an amount
74 not exceeding the sum of the following:
75 a. theThe transaction fee or discount charged by the
76 credit card, charge card, or debit card issuer or processor
77 with respect to such payments; and .
78 b. anyAny cost or fee charged with respect to the
79 payments pursuant to agreement between the Administrative
80 Office of Courts and a contracting entity which provides
81 software, support, and management services in connection with
82 the acceptance of payment by credit card, charge card, or
83 debit card by the clerks of the circuit and district courts as
84 provided herein.
Page 3

provided herein.
SB182 Enrolled
85 (2) The imposition and validity of any surcharges or
86 convenience fees heretofore charged and collected by clerks of
87 the circuit or district courts or their agents prior to June
88 1, 2014, are hereby ratified and confirmed.
89 (e) The Administrative Director of Courts or any
90 municipality may contract with any company that issues credit
91 cards to collect and seize credit cards issued by any company
92 that are outdated or otherwise unauthorized. The state or
93 municipality may charge the company a fee for the return of
94 the credit cards. Any fees collected pursuant to this
95 subsection by state courts shall be deposited into the
96 Advanced Technology and Data Exchange Fund and the fees
97 collected by a municipal court shall be deposited into the
98 general fund of the municipality.
99 (f) Procedures for implementing the provisions of Act
100 99-427 may be promulgated adopted as Rules of Judicial
101 Administration adopted by the Supreme Court of Alabama.
102 (g) At the end of any fiscal year, any unexpended or
103 unencumbered monies contributed to or deposited in the fund
104 from any source, except appropriations from other state funds,
105 shall remain in the fund.
106 (h) The clerk of any court shall not be liable to any
107 person for any action taken pursuant to this section if he or
108 she acts in accordance with the rules adopted by the
109 Administrative Office of Courts."
110 Section 2. (a) The Supreme Court Advanced Technology
111 and Data Exchange Fund is created in the State Treasury.
112 (b) The fund shall consist of all monies paid into the
Page 4

(b) The fund shall consist of all monies paid into the
SB182 Enrolled
113 State Treasury to the credit of the fund through user fees,
114 copy fees, subscriptions, service charges, and any other
115 sources associated with the operation of the appellate court
116 case management system or by the legislative appropriations,
117 grant, gift, or otherwise.
118 (c) Monies contained in the fund may be expended by the
119 Supreme Court of Alabama to provide for any activities
120 involving the administration of justice including the
121 following purposes:
122 (1) Expand methods and means for collection and
123 disbursement of court-ordered monies through the use of credit
124 cards, electronic funds transfers, or other means and provide
125 for electronic transfer of records and storage.
126 (2) Enhance coordination and sharing of data with
127 local, state, and federal agencies, members of the bar, and
128 the public.
129 (3) Provide equipment for electronically filing cases.
130 (4) Improve accountability for case filings and
131 dispositions.
132 (5) Train and educate employees and officials on the
133 trial or appellate levels of the Unified Judicial System
134 regarding legal and administrative policies and procedures and
135 effective usage of the courts' management systems.
136 (6) Provide education materials including manuals,
137 forms, handbooks, books, brochures, and technology for legal
138 research and case management for appellate and trial court
139 officials and employees and component groups of the legal
140 community.
Page 5

community.
SB182 Enrolled
141 (7) Provide staff, services, and equipment required to
142 maintain and expand technological improvements and conduct
143 continuing education and training in these areas.
144 (8) Provide for any other use by the Supreme Court of
145 Alabama for the general operations that further the
146 administration of justice.
147 (9) Pay service charges, electronic transfer fees, or
148 any other transaction costs associated with subdivisions (1)
149 to (8), inclusive.
150 (d) The Administrative Office of Courts is authorized
151 to transfer to the Supreme Court Advanced Technology and Data
152 Exchange Fund established by subsection (a) any amounts on
153 deposit in the Administrative Office of Courts Advanced
154 Technology Data and Exchange Fund to the credit of the Supreme
155 Court of Alabama.
156 (e) At the end of any fiscal year, any unexpended or
157 unencumbered monies contributed to or deposited in the fund
158 from any source shall remain in the fund for the use of the
159 Supreme Court of Alabama.
160 (f) All monies in the fund shall be budgeted and
161 allotted pursuant to the Budget Management Act in accordance
162 with Article 4 of Chapter 4 and Chapter 19 of Title 41, Code
163 of Alabama 1975, and only in the amount provided by the
164 Legislature in the general appropriations act or other
165 appropriations act.
166 Section 3. (a) The Court of Civil Appeals Advanced
167 Technology and Data Exchange Fund is created in the State
168 Treasury.
Page 6

Treasury.
SB182 Enrolled
169 (b) The fund shall consist of all monies paid into the
170 State Treasury to the credit of the fund through user fees,
171 copy fees, subscriptions, service charges, and any other
172 sources associated with the operation of the appellate court
173 case management system or by the legislative appropriations,
174 grant, gift, or otherwise.
175 (c) Monies contained in the fund may be expended by the
176 Alabama Court of Civil Appeals to provide for any activities
177 involving the administration of justice including the
178 following purposes:
179 (1) Expand methods and means for collection and
180 disbursement of court-ordered monies through the use of credit
181 cards, electronic funds transfers, or other means and provide
182 for electronic transfer of records and storage.
183 (2) Enhance coordination and sharing of data with
184 local, state, and federal agencies, members of the bar, and
185 the public.
186 (3) Provide equipment for electronically filing cases.
187 (4) Improve accountability for case filings and
188 dispositions.
189 (5) Train and educate employees and officials on the
190 trial or appellate levels of the Unified Judicial System
191 regarding legal and administrative policies and procedures and
192 effective usage of the courts' management systems.
193 (6) Provide education materials including manuals,
194 forms, handbooks, books, brochures, and technology for legal
195 research and case management for appellate and trial court
196 officials and employees and component groups of the legal
Page 7

officials and employees and component groups of the legal
SB182 Enrolled
197 community.
198 (7) Provide staff, services, and equipment required to
199 maintain and expand technological improvements and conduct
200 continuing education and training in these areas.
201 (8) Provide for any other use by the Alabama Court of
202 Civil Appeals for the general operations that further the
203 administration of justice.
204 (9) Pay service charges, electronic transfer fees, or
205 any other transaction costs associated with subdivisions (1)
206 to (8), inclusive.
207 (d) The Administrative Office of Courts is authorized
208 to transfer to the Court of Civil Appeals Advanced Technology
209 and Data Exchange Fund established by subsection (a) any
210 amounts on deposit in the Administrative Office of Courts
211 Advanced Technology Data and Exchange Fund to the credit of
212 the Alabama Court of Civil Appeals.
213 (e) At the end of any fiscal year, any unexpended or
214 unencumbered monies contributed to or deposited in the fund
215 from any source shall remain in the fund for the use of the
216 Alabama Court of Civil Appeals.
217 (f) All monies in the fund shall be budgeted and
218 allotted pursuant to the Budget Management Act in accordance
219 with Article 4 of Chapter 4 and Chapter 19 of Title 41, Code
220 of Alabama 1975, and only in the amount provided by the
221 Legislature in the general appropriations act or other
222 appropriations act.
223 Section 4. (a) The Court of Criminal Appeals Advanced
224 Technology and Data Exchange Fund is created in the State
Page 8

Technology and Data Exchange Fund is created in the State
SB182 Enrolled
225 Treasury.
226 (b) The fund shall consist of all monies paid into the
227 State Treasury to the credit of the fund through user fees,
228 copy fees, subscriptions, service charges, and any other
229 sources associated with the operation of the appellate court
230 case management system or by the legislative appropriations,
231 grant, gift, or otherwise.
232 (c) Monies contained in the fund may be expended by the
233 Alabama Court of Criminal Appeals to provide for any
234 activities involving the administration of justice including
235 the following purposes:
236 (1) Expand methods and means for collection and
237 disbursement of court-ordered monies through the use of credit
238 cards, electronic funds transfers, or other means and provide
239 for electronic transfer of records and storage.
240 (2) Enhance coordination and sharing of data with
241 local, state, and federal agencies, members of the bar, and
242 the public.
243 (3) Provide equipment for electronically filing cases.
244 (4) Improve accountability for case filings and
245 dispositions.
246 (5) Train and educate employees and officials on the
247 trial or appellate levels of the Unified Judicial System
248 regarding legal and administrative policies and procedures and
249 effective usage of the courts' management systems.
250 (6) Provide education materials including manuals,
251 forms, handbooks, books, brochures, and technology for legal
252 research and case management for appellate and trial court
Page 9

research and case management for appellate and trial court
SB182 Enrolled
253 officials and employees and component groups of the legal
254 community.
255 (7) Provide staff, services, and equipment required to
256 maintain and expand technological improvements and conduct
257 continuing education and training in these areas.
258 (8) Provide for any other use by the Alabama Court of
259 Criminal Appeals for the general operations that further the
260 administration of justice.
261 (9) Pay service charges, electronic transfer fees, or
262 any other transaction costs associated with subdivisions (1)
263 to (8), inclusive.
264 (d) The Administrative Office of Courts is authorized
265 to transfer to the Court of Criminal Appeals Advanced
266 Technology and Data Exchange Fund established by subsection
267 (a) any amounts on deposit in the Administrative Office of
268 Courts Advanced Technology Data and Exchange Fund to the
269 credit of the Alabama Court of Criminal Appeals.
270 (e) At the end of any fiscal year, any unexpended or
271 unencumbered monies contributed to or deposited in the fund
272 from any source shall remain in the fund for the use of the
273 Alabama Court of Criminal Appeals.
274 (f) All monies in the fund shall be budgeted and
275 allotted pursuant to the Budget Management Act in accordance
276 with Article 4 of Chapter 4 and Chapter 19 of Title 41, Code
277 of Alabama 1975, and only in the amount provided by the
278 Legislature in the general appropriations act or other
279 appropriations act.
280 Section 5. This act shall become effective on June 1,
Page 10

Section 5. This act shall become effective on June 1,
SB182 Enrolled
281 2026.
Page 11

2026.
SB182 Enrolled
282
283
284
285
286
287
288 ________________________________________________
289 President and Presiding Officer of the Senate
290
291
292
293 ________________________________________________
294 Speaker of the House of Representatives
295
296
297 SB182
298 Senate 24-Feb-26
299 I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and passed
300 the Senate.
301
302 Patrick Harris,
303 Secretary.
304
305
306
307
308 House of Representatives
309 Passed: 19-Mar-26
310
311
312
313
314 By: Senator Coleman
Page 12